Hawaii statutes.
§580-13 Security and enforcement of
maintenance and alimony. Whenever the court makes an order or decree
requiring a spouse to provide for the care, maintenance, and education of
children, or for an allowance to the other spouse, the court may require the
person subject to such order or decree to give reasonable security for such
maintenance and allowance. Upon neglect or refusal to give the security, or
upon default of the person subject to such order or decree and such person's
surety to provide the maintenance and allowance, the court may sequester such
person's personal estate, and the rents and profits of such person's real
estate, and may appoint a receiver thereof and cause such person's personal
estate and the rents and profits of such person's real estate to be applied
towards such maintenance and allowance, as to the court shall from time to time
seem just and reasonable. [CC 1859, §1333; am L 1903, c 22, §2; RL 1925, §2981;
RL 1935, §4477; RL 1945, §12228; RL 1955, §324-39; HRS §580-13; am L 1973, c
211, §5(h); am L 1974, c 65, pt of §2]

Case Notes

This section is limitation upon words "or out of his
property" found in §580-74. 26 H. 128.

Application in connection with contempt. 28 H. 291.

Receiver appointed. 28 H. 291; 35 H. 570.

Sequestration. 33 H. 725.

Judicial sale of real property at suggestion of both
parties. 39 H. 653.

Failure to comply with alimony order must be punished as
criminal contempt if contemnor lacks present ability to comply. 60 H. 160, 587
P.2d 1220.

Cited: 13 H. 654, 661; 14 H. 152, 156; 23 H. 281, 289; 31 H.
574, 576.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next